Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5193.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 PART 1 LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state departments and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch described in this part for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026 from the funds indicated in this part. The following is a summary of the appropriations in this part: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 600,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 600,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 600,000,000 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 600,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 600,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 600,000,000 (2) PUBLIC ASSISTANCE Food assistance program benefits $ 600,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 600,000,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 600,000,000 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, total state spending from state sources under part 1 is $600,000,000.00 and state spending from state sources under part 1 to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES Sec. 301. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for food assistance program benefits, the department of health and human services shall continue to provide, without pause, food assistance program benefits. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 (2) Funds appropriated in part 1 for food assistance program benefits must come from not less than $600,000,000.00 in work project lapses from general fund/general purpose or general fund/general purpose equivalent. Work project lapses must be from work project appropriations without statutory authority designating those work projects, as directed by the state budget director in section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a. (3) As used in this section, "work project appropriations without statutory authority designating those work projects" means appropriations designated as work projects under section 451a(3) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a. Sec. 302. The department shall seek any and all federal reimbursements to offset general fund/general purpose revenues appropriated for food assistance program benefits.